local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="/gouzout__vblex">
      <e>
        <par n="initial-g"/>
        <p>
          <l>ouzout</l>
          <r>ouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouzon</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouzout</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oar</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouzomp</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouzc’h</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouzont</l>
          <r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="debr/iñ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iñ</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="gouzout"><i/><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="debriñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ebr</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
